test/src/gt-norm-yamls/proper-smi_gt-norm.yaml
    Joe+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ine: Joean
    Joe+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill: Joeaj
    Joe+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela: Joeas
    Joe+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Com: Joeajn
    Joe+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Nom: Joea
    Joe+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Ine: Joeajn
    Joe+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Ess: Joean
    Joe+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Joe+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    
  Propernoun - Company: # NYSTØ-obj 
    Hayashi+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom: Hayashi
    Hayashi+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen: Hayashia
    Hayashi+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Acc: Hayashiav
    Hayashi+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ine: Hayashian
    Hayashi+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill: Hayashiaj
    Hayashi+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela: Hayashias
    Hayashi+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Com: Hayashiajn
    Hayashi+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Pl+Nom: Hayashia
    Hayashi+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Pl+Ine: Hayashiajn
    Hayashi+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Ess: Hayashian
    Hayashi+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Hayashi+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    
  Propernoun - Dagsrevy: # NYSTØ-org
    Dagsrevy+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom: Dagsrevy
    Dagsrevy+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Gen: Dagsrevya
    Dagsrevy+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Acc: Dagsrevyav
    Dagsrevy+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ine: Dagsrevyan
    Dagsrevy+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill: Dagsrevyaj
    Dagsrevy+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela: Dagsrevyas
    Dagsrevy+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Com: Dagsrevyajn
    Dagsrevy+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Nom: Dagsrevya
    Dagsrevy+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Ine: Dagsrevyajn
    Dagsrevy+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Ess: Dagsrevyan
    Dagsrevy+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Dagsrevy+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    
  Propernoun - Sameby: # NYSTØ-LOAN-org
    Sameby+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom: Sameby 
    Sameby+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Gen: []
    Sameby+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Acc: []
    Sameby+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ine: []
    Sameby+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill: []
    Sameby+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela: []
    Sameby+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Com: []
    Sameby+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Nom: []
    Sameby+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Ine: []
    Sameby+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Ess: []
    Sameby+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Sameby+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []  
  
  Propernoun - Formo: # NYSTØ-Sur # o-final words are o9 (prevent o:u)
    Formo+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom: Formo 
    Formo+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen: Formoa
    Formo+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Acc: Formoav
    Formo+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ine: Formoan
    Formo+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill: Formoaj
    Formo+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela: Formoas
    Formo+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Com: Formoajn
    Formo+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Pl+Nom: Formoa
    Formo+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Pl+Ine: Formoajn
    Formo+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Ess: Formoan
    Formo+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Formo+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    
  Propernoun - Skjervø: # NYSTØ-LOAN-plc 
    Skjervø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Skjervø 
    Skjervø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: []
    Skjervø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc: []
    Skjervø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine: []
    Skjervø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: []
    Skjervø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela: []
    Skjervø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com: []
    Skjervø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: []
    Skjervø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ine: []
    Skjervø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: []
    Skjervø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Skjervø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []  
    
  Propernoun - Bo: # NYSTØ-plc # o-final words are o9 (prevent o:u)
    Bo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Bo 
    Bo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Boa
    Bo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc: Boav
    Bo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine: Boan
    Bo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Boaj
    Bo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela: Boas
    Bo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com: Boajn
    Bo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Boa
    Bo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ine: Boajn
    Bo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: Boan
    Bo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: boalasj
    Bo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: boak 
  
  Propernoun - Bergsmo: # NYSTØ-plc # o-final words are o9 (prevent o:u)
    Bergsmo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Bergsmo 
    Bergsmo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Bergsmoa
    Bergsmo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc: Bergsmoav
    Bergsmo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine: Bergsmoan
    Bergsmo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Bergsmoaj
    Bergsmo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela: Bergsmoas
    Bergsmo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com: Bergsmoajn
    Bergsmo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Bergsmoa
    Bergsmo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ine: Bergsmoajn
    Bergsmo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: Bergsmoan
    Bergsmo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: bergsmoalasj
    Bergsmo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: bergsmoak
    
  Propernoun - Cupp: # BERN-ani 
    Cupp+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Nom: Cupp 
    Cupp+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Gen: Cuppa
    Cupp+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Acc: Cuppav
    Cupp+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Ine: Cuppan
    Cupp+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Ill: Cuppaj
    Cupp+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Ela: Cuppas
    Cupp+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Com: Cuppajn
    Cupp+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Pl+Nom: Cuppa
    Cupp+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Pl+Ine: Cuppajn
    Cupp+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Ess: Cuppan
    Cupp+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Cupp+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    
  Propernoun - Curt: # BERN-mal
    Curt+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom: Curt 
    Curt+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen: Curta
    Curt+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Acc: Curtav
    Curt+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ine: Curtan
    Curt+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill: Curtaj
    Curt+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela: Curtas
    Curt+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Com: Curtajn
    Curt+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Nom: Curta
    Curt+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Ine: Curtajn
    Curt+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Ess: Curtan
    Curt+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Curt+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Clark: # BERN-surmal
    Clark+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom: Clark 
    Clark+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen: Clarka
    Clark+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Acc: Clarkav
    Clark+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ine: Clarkan
    Clark+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill: Clarkaj
    Clark+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela: Clarkas
    Clark+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Com: Clarkajn
    Clark+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Pl+Nom: Clarka
    Clark+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Pl+Ine: Clarkajn
    Clark+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Ess: Clarkan
    Clark+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Clark+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Clark+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom: Clark 
    Clark+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen: Clarka
    Clark+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Acc: Clarkav
    Clark+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ine: Clarkan
    Clark+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill: Clarkaj
    Clark+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela: Clarkas
    Clark+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Com: Clarkajn
    Clark+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Nom: Clarka
    Clark+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Ine: Clarkajn
    Clark+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Ess: Clarkan
    Clark+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Clark+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    
  Propernoun - Dagfrid: # BERN-fem 
    Dagfrid+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom: Dagfrid 
    Dagfrid+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Gen: Dagfrida
    Dagfrid+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Acc: Dagfridav
    Dagfrid+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ine: Dagfridan
    Dagfrid+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill: Dagfridaj
    Dagfrid+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela: Dagfridas
    Dagfrid+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Com: Dagfridajn
    Dagfrid+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Nom: Dagfrida
    Dagfrid+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Ine: Dagfridajn
    Dagfrid+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Ess: Dagfridan
    Dagfrid+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Dagfrid+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Dagsvik: # BERN-sur
    Dagsvik+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom: Dagsvik 
    Dagsvik+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen: Dagsvika
    Dagsvik+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Acc: Dagsvikav
    Dagsvik+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ine: Dagsvikan
    Dagsvik+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill: Dagsvikaj
    Dagsvik+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela: Dagsvikas
    Dagsvik+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Com: Dagsvikajn
    Dagsvik+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Pl+Nom: Dagsvika
    Dagsvik+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Pl+Ine: Dagsvikajn
    Dagsvik+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Ess: Dagsvikan
    Dagsvik+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Dagsvik+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    
  Propernoun - Dakar: # BERN-plc
    Dakar+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Dakar 
    Dakar+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Dakara
    Dakar+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc: Dakarav
    Dakar+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine: Dakaran
    Dakar+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Dakaraj
    Dakar+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela: Dakaras
    Dakar+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com: Dakarajn
    Dakar+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Dakara
    Dakar+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ine: Dakarajn
    Dakar+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: Dakaran
    Dakar+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: dakaralasj
    Dakar+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: dakarak 
    
  Propernoun - Stenbukk: # BERN-objsur
    Stenbukk+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom: Stenbukk 
    Stenbukk+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen: Stenbukka
    Stenbukk+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Acc: Stenbukkav
    Stenbukk+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ine: Stenbukkan
    Stenbukk+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill: Stenbukkaj
    Stenbukk+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela: Stenbukkas
    Stenbukk+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Com: Stenbukkajn
    Stenbukk+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Pl+Nom: Stenbukka
    Stenbukk+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Pl+Ine: Stenbukkajn
    Stenbukk+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Ess: Stenbukkan
    Stenbukk+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Stenbukk+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Stenbukk+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom: Stenbukk 
    Stenbukk+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen: Stenbukka
    Stenbukk+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Acc: Stenbukkav
    Stenbukk+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ine: Stenbukkan
    Stenbukk+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill: Stenbukkaj
    Stenbukk+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela: Stenbukkas
    Stenbukk+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Com: Stenbukkajn
    Stenbukk+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Pl+Nom: Stenbukka
    Stenbukk+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Pl+Ine: Stenbukkajn
    Stenbukk+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Ess: Stenbukkan
    Stenbukk+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Stenbukk+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    
  Propernoun - Nord: # BERN-orgsur
    Nord+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom: Nord 
    Nord+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Gen: Norda
    Nord+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Acc: Nordav
    Nord+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ine: Nordan
    Nord+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill: Nordaj
    Nord+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela: Nordas
    Nord+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Com: Nordajn
    Nord+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Nom: Norda
    Nord+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Ine: Nordajn
    Nord+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Ess: Nordan
    Nord+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Nord+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Nord+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom: Nord 
    Nord+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen: Norda
    Nord+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Acc: Nordav
    Nord+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ine: Nordan
    Nord+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill: Nordaj
    Nord+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela: Nordas
    Nord+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Com: Nordajn
    Nord+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Pl+Nom: Norda
    Nord+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Pl+Ine: Nordajn
    Nord+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Ess: Nordan
    Nord+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Nord+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    
  Propernoun - Nordlit: # BERN-obj
    Nordlit+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom: Nordlit 
    Nordlit+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen: Nordlita
    Nordlit+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Acc: Nordlitav
    Nordlit+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ine: Nordlitan
    Nordlit+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill: Nordlitaj
    Nordlit+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela: Nordlitas
    Nordlit+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Com: Nordlitajn
    Nordlit+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Pl+Nom: Nordlita
    Nordlit+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Pl+Ine: Nordlitajn
    Nordlit+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Ess: Nordlitan
    Nordlit+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Nordlit+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
